Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-408
Action by franchisee; defense.

It shall be a defense for a franchisor, to any action brought under sections 87-401 to 87-410 by a franchisee, if it be shown that such franchisee has failed to substantially comply with requirements imposed by the franchise and other agreements ancillary or collateral thereto.

Laws 1978, LB 202, § 8.